Illinois, session 104th, SB4123.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, for objects and purposes 7hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the ordinary and 8contingent expenses of the Environmental Protection Agency 9for:10ADMINISTRATION11Payable from U.S. Environmental Protection Fund:12  For Contractual Services..........................2,500,00013  For Electronic Data Processing....................2,000,00014Payable from Underground Storage Tank Fund:15  For Contractual Services..........................1,000,00016  For Electronic Data Processing....................2,000,00017Payable from Solid Waste Management Fund:18  For Contractual Services..........................1,000,00019  For Electronic Data Processing....................1,000,00020Payable from Subtitle D Management Fund:21  For Contractual Services............................200,00022  For Electronic Data Processing......................200,00023Payable from Clean Water State Revolving Fund:  SB4123- 2 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1  For Contractual Services..........................1,125,0002  For Electronic Data Processing....................1,275,0003Payable from Hazardous Waste Fund:4  For Contractual Services............................150,0005  For Electronic Data Processing......................250,0006Payable from the Illinois Clean Water Fund:7  For Contractual Services............................200,0008  For Electronic Data Processing......................500,0009Payable from Environmental Protection 10 Permit and Inspection Fund:11  For Contractual Services............................500,00012  For Electronic Data Processing....................1,450,00013  For Refunds.......................................1,000,00014Payable from Vehicle Inspection Fund:15  For Contractual Services............................600,00016  For Electronic Data Processing....................1,250,00017Payable from Clean Air Act Permit Fund:18  For Contractual Services..........................1,000,00019  For Electronic Data Processing............................020Payable from Drinking Water State Revolving Fund:21  For Contractual Services............................375,00022  For Electronic Data Processing......................425,000 23    Section 10. The sum of $1,450,000, or so much thereof as 24may be necessary, is appropriated to the Environmental 25Protection Agency from the EPA Special State Projects Trust   SB4123- 3 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1Fund for the purpose of funding all costs associated with 2environmental programs, including prior years' costs. 3    Section 15. The sum of $400,000, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary, is appropriated from the U.S. Environmental 5Protection Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for all 6costs associated with environmental projects as defined by 7federal assistance awards. 8    Section 20. The sum of $250,000, or so much thereof as may 9be necessary, is appropriated from the Oil Spill Response Fund 10to the Environmental Protection Agency for use in accordance 11with Section 25c-1 of the Environmental Protection Act. 12    Section 25. The amount of $4,000,000, or so much thereof 13as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Environmental 14Protection Trust Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency 15for awards and grants as directed by the Environmental 16Protection Trust Fund Commission. 17    Section 30. The sum of $32,000,000, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated to the Environmental 19Protection Agency from the Motor Fuel Tax Fund for deposit 20into the Vehicle Inspection Fund. 21    Section 35. The sum of $38,000,000, or so much thereof as   SB4123- 4 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1may be necessary is appropriated to the Environmental 2Protection Agency from the EPA Court Trust Fund for all costs 3associated and allowable uses under Court Orders and 4Settlements entered on behalf of or by the Illinois 5Environmental Protection Agency 6    Section 40. The following named amounts, or so much 7thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 8purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to the 9Environmental Protection Agency for:10AIR POLLUTION CONTROL11Payable from U.S. Environmental12Protection Fund:13  For all expenses related to environmental14   projects as defined by federal assistance15   awards, including prior years' costs............14,100,00016  For Use by the City of Chicago......................412,00017  For all expenses related to Clean Air18   Activities and other environmental19   projects as defined by federal assistance20   awards, including prior years' costs.............2,000,00021    Total                                         $16,512,00022Payable from the Clean Air Act Permit Fund 23 For Clean Air Act and Energy Act Activities:24  For funding of Clean Air Act Title V 25   Activities in accordance with Clean   SB4123- 5 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1   Air Act Amendments of 1990......................25,358,2002Payable from the Vehicle Inspection Fund:3  For Personal Services.............................6,084,6004  For State Contributions to State5   Employees' Retirement System.....................2,644,1006  For State Contributions to7   Social Security....................................465,5008  For Group Insurance...............................1,900,8009  For Contractual Services, including10   prior years' costs..............................20,000,00011  For Travel...........................................10,00012  For Commodities......................................15,00013  For Printing.........................................20,00014  For Equipment.......................................395,00015  For Telecommunication Services......................250,00016  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................20,00017Payable from the Environmental Protection 18 Permit and Inspection Fund: 19 For Air Permit and Inspection Activities:20  For Personal Services and other Expenses.........11,000,000 21    Section 45. The following named amounts, or so much 22thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the 23Electric Vehicle and Charging Fund to the Environmental 24Protection Agency for the purpose of administering the 25Electric Vehicle and Charging Program and the Ethanol Fuel   SB4123- 6 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1Research Program:2  For Personal Services and Other3   Expenses...........................................600,0004  For Grants and Rebates, including5   prior years' costs..............................14,000,0006    Total                                         $14,600,000 7    Section 50. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the U.S. Environmental 9Protection Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for 10expenses and grants connected with the Climate Pollution 11Reduction Grant planning program as authorized by Section 1260114 of the Inflation Reduction Act (IRA) of 2022. 13    Section 55. The sum of $150,000, or so much thereof as may 14be necessary, is appropriated from the Alternative Compliance 15Market Account Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for 16all costs associated with the emissions reduction market 17program. 18LABORATORY SERVICES 19    Section 60. The sum of $1,300,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the Community Water 21Supply Laboratory Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency 22for the purpose of performing laboratory testing of samples 23from community water supplies and for administrative costs of   SB4123- 7 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1the Agency and the Community Water Supply Testing Council. 2    Section 65. The sum of $600,000, or so much thereof as may 3be necessary, is appropriated from the Environmental 4Laboratory Certification Fund to the Environmental Protection 5Agency for the purpose of administering the laboratory 6certification program. 7    Section 70. The sum of $2,800,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Clean 9Water Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for the 10purpose of laboratory analysis of samples. 11    Section 75. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the Solid Waste 13Management Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for the 14purpose of laboratory analysis of samples. 15    Section 80. The following named amounts, or so much 16thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 17purposes hereinafter named are appropriated to the 18Environmental Protection Agency for: 19LAND POLLUTION CONTROL20Payable from the Road Fund:21  For deposit into the Electric Vehicle and Charging Fund  SB4123- 8 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1   for electric vehicle grants and rebates..........9,000,0002Payable from U.S. Environmental 3 Protection Fund:4  For Underground Storage Tank Program, 5   including prior years' costs.....................3,000,0006  For all expenses related to environmental7   projects as defined by federal assistance8   awards, including prior years' costs............11,105,0009  For all expenses related to remedial,10   preventive or corrective actions in accordance11   with the Federal Comprehensive and Liability12   Act of 1980 and other environmental13   projects as defined by federal assistance14   awards, including prior years' costs............10,000,00015    Total                                         $33,105,000 16    Section 85. The sum of $2,500,000, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated from the U.S. Environmental 18Protection Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for 19expenses related to The State and Tribal Brownfields response 20program authorized by Section 128(a) of the Comprehensive 21Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act. 22    Section 90. The following named sums, or so much thereof 23as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Environmental 24Protection Agency for the purpose of funding the Underground   SB4123- 9 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1Storage Tank Program:2Payable from the Underground Storage Tank Fund:3  For Personal Services.............................8,629,2004  For State Contributions to State5   Employees' Retirement System.....................3,749,9006  For State Contributions to7   Social Security....................................660,1008  For Group Insurance...............................2,604,8009  For Contractual Services..........................5,000,00010  For Travel...........................................40,00011  For Commodities.....................................100,00012  For Printing..........................................5,00013  For Equipment.......................................843,00014  For Telecommunication Services......................145,00015  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................16,00016  For Contracts for Site Remediation and17   for Reimbursements to Eligible Owners/18   Operators of Leaking Underground19   Storage Tanks, including claims20   submitted in prior years........................40,100,00021    Total                                         $61,893,000 22    Section 95. The following named sums, or so much thereof 23as may be necessary, are appropriated from the Solid Waste 24Management Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for use 25in accordance with Section 22.15 of the Environmental   SB4123- 10 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1Protection Act:2  For Personal Services.............................8,571,2003  For State Contributions to State4   Employees' Retirement System.....................3,724,7005  For State Contributions to6   Social Security....................................655,7007  For Group Insurance...............................2,956,8008  For Contractual Services............................100,0009  For Travel...........................................40,00010  For Commodities......................................25,00011  For Printing.........................................35,00012  For Equipment........................................34,50013  For Telecommunication Services.......................85,00014  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................15,00015  For Refunds...........................................5,00016  For financial assistance to units of local17   government for operations under delegation18   agreements, including prior years' costs.........2,500,00019    Total                                         $18,747,900 20    Section 100. The sum of $11,500,000, or so much therefore 21as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Solid Waste 22Management Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for all 23costs associated with solid waste management activities, 24including prior years' costs.   SB4123- 11 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1    Section 105. The sum of $3,500,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Subtitle D 3Management Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for the 4purpose of funding the Subtitle D permit program in accordance 5with Section 22.44 of the Environmental Protection Act. 6    Section 110. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the Brownfields 8Redevelopment Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for 9all expenses related to the Municipal Brownfields 10Redevelopment Grant program. 11    Section 115. The sum of $4,500,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the Brownfields 13Redevelopment Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for 14financial assistance for Brownfields redevelopment in 15accordance with 58.3(5), 58.13 and 58.15 of the Environmental 16Protection Act, including prior years' costs. 17    Section 120. The sum of $2,500,000, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated from the Brownfields 19Redevelopment Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for 20all expenses related to the Brownfields Community Wide 21Assessment Program. 22    Section 125. The following named amounts, or so much   SB4123- 12 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the Used 2Tire Management Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency 3for purposes as provided for in Section 55.6 of the 4Environmental Protection Act:5  For Personal Services.............................5,206,4006  For State Contributions to State7   Employees' Retirement System.....................2,262,5008  For State Contributions to9   Social Security....................................398,30010  For Group Insurance...............................1,548,80011  For Contractual Services, including12   prior years' costs...............................3,500,00013  For Travel...........................................20,00014  For Commodities......................................10,00015  For Printing.........................................10,00016  For Equipment........................................20,00017  For Telecommunication Services.......................50,00018  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................25,00019    Total                                         $13,051,000 20    Section 130. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the Drycleaner 22Environmental Response Trust Fund to the Environmental 23Protection Agency for use in accordance with the Drycleaner 24Environmental Response Trust Fund Act, including prior years' 25costs.   SB4123- 13 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1    Section 135. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Renewable Energy 3Resources Trust Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency to 4provide a grant to Joliet Junior College for purposes of 5funding education and training for renewable energy and energy 6efficiency technology, and for the operations and services of 7the Illinois Green Economy Network, pursuant to Section 6-5 of 8the Renewable Energy, Energy Efficiency, and Coal Resources 9Development Law of 1997. 10    Section 145. The following named sums, or so much thereof 11as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Environmental 12Protection Agency for use in accordance with Section 22.2 of 13the Environmental Protection Act:14Payable from the Hazardous Waste Fund:15  For all expenses related to Hazardous Waste16   Remediation, including prior years' costs.......17,000,00017  For Refunds..........................................50,00018    Total                                         $17,050,000 19    Section 150. The sum of $1,300,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the Environmental 21Protection Trust Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency 22for all expenses related to removal or mediation actions at 23the Worthy Park, Cook County, hazardous waste site.   SB4123- 14 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1    Section 155. The sum of $6,500,600, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Environmental 3Protection Permit and Inspection Fund to the Environmental 4Protection Agency for all costs associated with land permit 5and inspection activities. 6    Section 160. The sum of $51,500,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the Environmental 8Disaster and Remediation Fund to the Environmental Protection 9Agency for the purpose of funding any inspection, remedial, 10and corrective action, and post-closure activities, in 11accordance with the Environmental Protection Act, including 12prior years' costs.  13    Section 165. The sum of $2,200,000, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Energy Fund 15to the Environmental Protection Agency for expenses and grants 16connected with the HOMES Rebate Program as authorized by 17Section 50121 of the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (IRA) and 18the HEEHRA Rebate Program by Section 50122 of the Inflation 19Reduction Act of 2022 (IRA). 20    Section 170. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Energy Fund 22to the Environmental Protection Agency for expenses and grants   SB4123- 15 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1connected with the Energy Audit Training Program. 2    Section 175. The sum of $7,000,000, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Energy Fund 4to the Environmental Protection Agency for expenses and grants 5connected with enforcement of the Illinois Energy Conservation 6Code. 7    Section 180. The sum of $6,000,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Energy Fund 9to the Environmental Protection Agency for expenses and grants 10connected with the State Energy Program, including prior 11years' costs. 12    Section 185. The sum of $14,260,000, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Energy Fund 14to the Environmental Protection Agency for costs associated 15with State Energy Programs as authorized by Title I of 16Division D in Section 40109 of the Infrastructure Investment 17and Jobs Act (IIJA), including prior years' cost. 18    Section 190. The sum of $1,250,000, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Energy Fund 20to the Environmental Protection Agency for costs associated 21with the Energy Revolving Loan Program as authorized by Title 22V of Division D in Section 40502 of the Infrastructure and   SB4123- 16 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1Investment and Jobs Act (IIJA), including prior years' cost. 2    Section 195. The sum of $2,910,000, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Energy Fund 4to the Environmental Protection Agency for costs associated 5with the Energy Efficiency and Conservation Block Grant 6Program as authorized by Title V of Division D of the 7Infrastructure and Investment and Jobs Act (IIJA) in 8accordance with Section 544 of the Energy Independence and 9Security Act of 2007, including prior years' cost. 10    Section 200. The sum of $6,000,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Energy Fund 12to the Environmental Protection Agency for expenses relating 13to various federal projects. 14    Section 205. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the Energy Efficiency 16Trust Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for grants 17pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 6-6 of the Renewable 18Energy, Energy Efficiency, and Coal Resources Development Law 19of 1997. 20    Section 210. The sum of $200,000, or so much thereof as may 21be necessary, is appropriated from the Energy Efficiency Trust 22Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for operational   SB4123- 17 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1expenses related to administering grants made pursuant to 2subsection (b) of Section 6-6 of the Renewable Energy, Energy 3Efficiency, and Coal Resources Development Law of 1997. 4    Section 215. The sum of $7,100,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated to the Environmental 6Protection Agency from the Federal Energy Fund for all costs 7associated with the Contractor Training Grant Program, 8including prior years' costs. 9    Section 220. The sum of $400,000, or so much thereof as may 10be necessary, is appropriated from the Carbon Dioxide 11Sequestration Administrative Fund to the Environmental 12Protection Agency for all costs associated with the Safety and 13Aid for the Environment in Carbon Capture and Sequestration 14Act (SAFE CCS Act). 15    Section 225. The sum of $100,000, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated from the Environmental Justice 17Grant Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for all 18costs associated with issuance of grants in accordance with 19the Safety and Aid for the Environment in Carbon Capture and 20Sequestration Act (SAFE CCS Act). 21    Section 230. The following named amounts, or so much 22thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for objects and   SB4123- 18 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 2ordinary and contingent expenses of the Environmental 3Protection Agency for:4BUREAU OF WATER5Payable from U.S. Environmental 6 Protection Fund:7  For all expenses related to non-point source8   pollution management and special water pollution9   studies and other environmental10   projects as defined by federal assistance11   awards, including prior years' costs.............8,950,00012  For Use by the Department of13   Public Health....................................1,500,00014  For enforcement of actions under the Gulf15   Hypoxia Action Plan pursuant to the16   Infrastructure Investment and17   Jobs Act (IIJA)....................................795,00018  For Expenses Related to Federal Grants and19   Awards, including prior years' costs............15,000,00020    Total                                         $26,245,000 21    Section 235. The following named amounts, or so much 22thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the object and 23purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to the 24Environmental Protection Agency:25Payable from the Clean Water State Revolving Fund:  SB4123- 19 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1  For Administrative Costs of Water Pollution2   Control Revolving Loan Program..................12,000,0003  For Program Support Costs of Water4   Pollution Control Program.......................22,000,0005Payable from the Drinking Water State Revolving Fund:6  For Administrative Costs of the Drinking7   Water Revolving Loan Program.....................9,000,0008  For Program Support Costs of the Drinking9   Water Program...................................13,000,00010  For Small System Technical Assistance, 11   Administration of the Public Water System 12   Supervision (PWSS) Program, Source Water 13   Protection Programs, Development and Implementation14   of Capacity Development and Operator Certification15   Programs, and Local Assistance and 16   other 1452(k) Activities.........................2,000,00017    Total                                         $58,000,000 18    Section 240. The sum of $17,000,000, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Clean 20Water Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for all 21costs associated with clean water activities. 22    Section 245. The sum of $6,000,000, or so much thereof as 23may be necessary, is appropriated from the Environmental 24Protection Permit and Inspection Fund to the Environmental   SB4123- 20 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1Protection Agency for all costs associated with water permit 2and inspection activities. 3    Section 250. The sum of $8,000,000, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary, is appropriated to the Environmental 5Protection Agency from the Clean Water State Revolving Fund 6for all costs associated with Environmental Management System 7(EMS) Services for the Bureau of Water. 8POLLUTION CONTROL BOARD DIVISION 9    Section 255. The amount of $2,290,300, or so much thereof 10as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Underground 11Storage Tank Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for 12case processing of leaking underground storage tank permit and 13claims appeals. 14    Section 260. The sum of $789,900, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary, is appropriated from the Clean Air Act Permit 16Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for costs 17associated with the handling of appeals from permitting and 18other determinations made by the Environmental Protection 19Agency. 20    Section 265. The following named amounts, or so much 21thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 22the Environmental Protection Agency for the objects and   SB4123- 21 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1purposes hereinafter named, to meet the ordinary and 2contingent expenses of the Pollution Control Board Division.3Payable from Pollution Control Board Fund:4  For Operational Expenses.............................15,0005  For Refunds...........................................2,0006    Total                                             $17,000 7    Section 270. The amount of $526,400, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the Used Tire 9Management Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for the 10purposes as provided for in Section 55.6 of the Environmental 11Protection Act. 12    Section 275. The sum of $1,322,000, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, is appropriated from the Environmental 14Protection Permit and Inspection Fund to the Environmental 15Protection Agency for costs associated with handling appeals 16from permitting and other determinations made by the 17Environmental Protection Agency. 18ARTICLE 219    Section 5. The sum of $25,000,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 21business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation heretofore 22made in Article 79, Section 5, of Public Act 104-0003 as   SB4123- 22 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1amended, is reappropriated from the VW Settlement 2Environmental Mitigation Fund to the Environmental Protection 3Agency for all costs, including administrative expenses, 4associated with funding eligible mitigation actions that 5achieve reductions of emissions in accordance with the 6Environmental Mitigation Trust Agreement relating to the 7Partial Consent Decree between U.S. Department of Justice, 8Volkswagen AG and other settling defendants. 9    Section 10. The sum of $15,832,287, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 11business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriations heretofore 12made in Article 78, Section 200 and Article 79, Section 10, of 13Public Act 104-0003 as amended, is reappropriated from the 14Energy Efficiency Trust Fund to the Environmental Protection 15Agency for grants pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 6-6 of 16the Renewable Energy, Energy Efficiency, and Coal Resources 17Development Law of 1997. 18    Section 15. The sum of $2,227,103, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 20business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriations heretofore 21made in Article 78, Section 225 and Article 79, Section 15 of 22Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the 23U.S. Environmental Protection Fund to the Environmental 24Protection Agency for enforcement of actions under the Gulf   SB4123- 23 -OMB104 00233 JCS 10233 b1Hypoxia Action Plan pursuant to the Infrastructure Investment 2and Jobs Act (IIJA). 3    Section 20. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 5business on June 30, 2026, from the appropriation heretofore 6made in Article 78, Section 110, of Public Act 104-0003, as 7amended, is reappropriated from the Brownfields Redevelopment 8Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for all expenses 9related to the Municipal Brownfields Redevelopment Grant 10program. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 122026.